Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.290

Catheterization of students—Rules. (Effective until June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) In accordance with rules adopted by the *commission, public school districts and private schools that offer classes for any of grades kindergarten through twelve may provide for clean, intermittent bladder catheterization of students or assisted self-catheterization of students who are in the custody of the school district or private school at the time. After consultation with staff of the superintendent of public instruction, the *commission shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, that provide for the following and such other matters as the *commission deems necessary to the proper implementation of this section:

(a) A requirement for a written, current, and unexpired request from a parent, legal guardian, or other person having legal control over the student that the school district or private school provide for the catheterization of the student;

(b) A requirement for a written, current, and unexpired request from a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, that catheterization of the student be provided for during the hours when school is in session or the hours when the student is under the supervision of school officials;

(c) A requirement for written, current, and unexpired instructions from an advanced registered nurse practitioner or a registered nurse licensed under this chapter regarding catheterization that include (i) a designation of the school district or private school employee or employees who may provide for the catheterization, and (ii) a description of the nature and extent of any required supervision; and

(d) The nature and extent of acceptable training that shall (i) be provided by a physician, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, or this chapter, and (ii) be required of school district or private school employees who provide for the catheterization of a student under this section, except that a licensed practical nurse licensed under this chapter is exempt from training.

(2) This section does not require school districts to provide intermittent bladder catheterization of students.

[1994 sp.s. c 9 s 429.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.

Catheterization of public and private school students: RCW 28A.210.280 and 28A.210.290.

PDFRCW 18.79.290

Catheterization of students—Rules. (Effective June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) In accordance with rules adopted by the board, public school districts and private schools that offer classes for any of grades kindergarten through twelve may provide for clean, intermittent bladder catheterization of students or assisted self-catheterization of students who are in the custody of the school district or private school at the time. After consultation with staff of the superintendent of public instruction, the board shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, that provide for the following and such other matters as the board deems necessary to the proper implementation of this section:

(a) A requirement for a written, current, and unexpired request from a parent, legal guardian, or other person having legal control over the student that the school district or private school provide for the catheterization of the student;

(b) A requirement for a written, current, and unexpired request from a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, that catheterization of the student be provided for during the hours when school is in session or the hours when the student is under the supervision of school officials;

(c) A requirement for written, current, and unexpired instructions from an advanced practice registered nurse or a registered nurse licensed under this chapter regarding catheterization that include (i) a designation of the school district or private school employee or employees who may provide for the catheterization, and (ii) a description of the nature and extent of any required supervision; and

(d) The nature and extent of acceptable training that shall (i) be provided by a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, or this chapter, and (ii) be required of school district or private school employees who provide for the catheterization of a student under this section, except that a licensed practical nurse licensed under this chapter is exempt from training.

(2) This section does not require school districts to provide intermittent bladder catheterization of students.

[2024 c 239 s 17; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 429.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 239: See note following RCW 18.79.030.

Catheterization of public and private school students: RCW 28A.210.280 and 28A.210.290.